Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Execution of Death Sentence

§ 7101.
Sentence and warrant.

In pronouncing sentence of death upon a person who is convicted of a capital crime, the court shall appoint a week within which the sentence shall be executed.
At the time of such sentence, the court shall order a warrant to be issued by the clerk, under the seal of the court for the county in which such sentence is passed, to be directed to the Commissioner of Corrections, stating the conviction and sentence and commanding him or her to cause execution to be done in accordance with the provisions of such sentence, upon a day within the week so appointed.
At the same time, the clerk shall transmit to the sheriff of the county in which such sentence is passed a mittimus directing him or her to deliver the body of such person to the Commissioner of Corrections and deliver to him or her a true and attested copy of such mittimus, the original of which shall be returned by the sheriff to the court from which issued. Unless a reprieve is granted or the inmate is pardoned, the sentence of death shall be executed by the Commissioner of Corrections, or by a person acting under his or her direction, within the week appointed by the court.
If a reprieve is granted, the sentence of death shall be executed within the week beginning on the day next after the day on which the term of respite expires, and such sentence shall be executed on such day within such week as the Commissioner elects.
Previous announcement thereof shall not be made, except to such persons as are to be present.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 7102.
Pardon.

If such inmate is pardoned by the Governor, the Governor shall forthwith issue his or her warrant to the Commissioner of Corrections superseding the original warrant provided for in section 7101 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 7103.
Place of execution.

The sentence of death shall be carried into effect at a place designated by the Commissioner of Corrections.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 7104.
Manner of confinement.

When the sentence of death is imposed, the court shall sentence, at the same time, the respondent to the custody of the Commissioner of Corrections until the time of execution.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 7105.
Persons present at execution.

There shall be present at the execution of the sentence of death, the Commissioner of Corrections or in case of his or her disability, the keeper, the person who is to perform the execution and his or her assistant, such persons as the Commissioner shall designate, and two physicians approved by the Commissioner.
The physicians present shall be the legal witnesses of the execution.
There may also be present the sheriff of the county in which the condemned was convicted or one of his or her deputies approved by him or her, such clergyman as the condemned may desire, and not more than three other persons to be selected by the Commissioner.
There shall be paid to the person actually performing the execution and to his or her assistant such sums for services and expenses as the Commissioner shall approve.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 7106.
Manner of execution.

The punishment of death shall be inflicted by causing to pass through the body of the convict a current of electricity of sufficient intensity to cause death, and the application of such current shall be continued until such convict is dead.

§ 7107.
Returns of Commissioner.

When the Commissioner of Corrections inflicts the punishment of death upon an inmate, in obedience to a warrant as aforesaid, he or she shall forthwith return a copy thereof with his or her doings thereon to the Office of the Secretary of State, and shall forthwith return the original warrant with his or her doings thereon to the court from which it was issued.
The clerk thereof shall subjoin to the record of the sentence a brief abstract of the Commissioner’s return upon such warrant.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.